Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-606
Dispatches; unlawful delay or disclosure; penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for any officer or employee of any telegraph company, or press association or corporation engaged in the transmission of dispatches, to willfully delay the transmission or delivery of any dispatch, or to willfully divulge the contents of any dispatch entrusted to his or her care, to any person except the party entitled to receive such dispatch.

(2) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1883, c. 80, § 6, p. 323;

R.S.1913, § 7400;

C.S.1922, § 7075;

C.S.1929, § 86-106;

R.S.1943, § 86-106;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 320;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-106;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 368.